Washington statutes.
RCW 36.53.050

Bond of licensee.

Every person applying for a license to keep a ferry shall, before the same is issued, enter into a bond with one or more sureties, to be approved by the county auditor, in a sum not less than one hundred nor more than five hundred dollars, conditioned that such person will keep the ferry according to law and that if default at any time is made in the condition of the bond, damages, not exceeding the penalty, may be recovered by any person aggrieved, before any court having jurisdiction.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.53.050. Prior: Code 1881 s 3006; 1879 p 62 s 42; 1869 p 281 s 44; 1863 p 522 s 5; 1854 p 354 s 5; RRS s 5466.]